Maryland, session 2026, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
4–203.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1465*

HOUSE BILL 1465
(a) The Department of the Environment shall implement the provisions of this
subtitle and shall consult the Department of Natural Resources from time to time,
including during the adoption of regulations, concerning the impact of stormwater on
waters of the State.
(b) (1) The Department shall adopt rules and regulations which establish
criteria and procedures for stormwater management in Maryland.
(2) The rules and regulations shall:
(i) Indicate that the primary goal of the State and local programs
will be to maintain after development, as nearly as possible, the predevelopment runoff
characteristics;
(ii) Make allowance for the difference in hydrologic characteristics
and stormwater management needs of different parts of the State;
(iii) Specify that watershed–wide analyses may be necessary to
prevent undesirable downstream effects of increased stormwater runoff;
(iv) Specify the exemptions a county or municipality may grant from
the requirements of submitting a stormwater management plan;
(v) 1. Specify the minimum content of the local ordinances or the
rules and regulations of the affected county governing body to be adopted which may be
done by inclusion of a model ordinance or model rules and regulations; and
2. Establish regulations and a model ordinance that require:
A. The implementation of environmental site design to the
maximum extent practicable;
B. The review and modification, if necessary, of planning and
zoning or public works ordinances to remove impediments to environmental site design
implementation; and
C. A developer to demonstrate that environmental site
design has been implemented to the maximum extent practicable and standard best
management practices have been used only where absolutely necessary;
(vi) Indicate that water quality practices may be required for any
redevelopment, even when predevelopment runoff characteristics are maintained;
(vii) Specify the minimum requirements for inspection and
maintenance of stormwater practices;

HOUSE BILL 1465 3
(viii) Specify that all stormwater management plans shall be designed
to:
1. Prevent soil erosion from any development project;
2. Prevent, to the maximum extent practicable, an increase
in nonpoint pollution;
3. Maintain the integrity of stream channels for their
biological function, as well as for drainage;
4. Minimize pollutants in stormwater runoff from new
development and redevelopment in order to:
A. Restore, enhance, and maintain the chemical, physical,
and biological integrity of the waters of the State;
B. Protect public health;
C. Safeguard fish and aquatic life and scenic and ecological
values; and
D. Enhance the domestic, municipal, recreational, industrial,
and other uses of water as specified by the Department;
5. Protect public safety through the proper design and
operation of stormwater management facilities;
6. Maintain 100% of average annual predevelopment
groundwater recharge volume for the site;
7. Capture and treat stormwater runoff to remove pollutants
and enhance water quality;
8. Implement a channel protection strategy to reduce
downstream erosion in receiving streams; and
9. Implement quantity control strategies to prevent
increases in the frequency and magnitude of out–of–bank flooding from large, less frequent
storm events;
(ix) 1. Establish a comprehensive process for approving grading
and sediment control plans and stormwater management plans; and
2. Specify that the comprehensive process established under
item (i) of this item takes into account the cumulative impacts of both plans; and

HOUSE BILL 1465
(x) Incorporate the most recent precipitation data available.
(3) (i) The Department shall review and update the regulations
adopted under this section at least once every 5 years.
(ii) In reviewing and updating the regulations adopted under this
section, the Department shall:
1. At a minimum, revise water quality and water quantity
control standards using the most recent precipitation data available; and
2. As necessary, update and revise the regulations to meet
the requirements of this subtitle.
(4) (i) On or before November 1, 2021, the Department shall report to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
1. The most recent precipitation data available;
2. The Department’s plans for immediately updating water
quantity control standards for watersheds where flooding events occurred on or after
January 1, 2000; and
3. The Department’s plans for updating all other regulations
adopted under this section.
(ii) After November 1, 2021, the Department shall report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on any
revisions the Department intends to make to the regulations adopted under this section
before publishing the regulations.
(c) (1) At least 6 months before the proposal of regulations under this section,
the Department shall:
(i) Post the regulatory process that the Department follows on the
Department’s website; and
(ii) Consult with the following groups and stakeholders on the
impact of the proposed regulations:
1. The Commission on Environmental Justice and
Sustainable Communities; and
2. Stakeholders with expertise on stormwater design
standards and climate science, including stakeholders from:
A. An academic institution;

HOUSE BILL 1465 5
B. The Chesapeake Bay Program;
C. The Chesapeake Bay Commission;
D. The Maryland Emergency Management Agency;
E. The Maryland Association of Soil Conservation Districts;
F. Local government;
G. A private sector entity with design and construction
experience; and
H. An association that has expertise in stormwater
restoration projects.
(2) Before any regulations required under this section are adopted, the
Department shall hold at least one public hearing in the affected immediate geographic
areas of the State and shall consult with the affected counties and municipalities.
(D) IN CARRYING OUT ITS DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL PRIORITIZE STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PRACTICES THAT:
(1) CAPTURE STORMWATER RUNOFF AT OR NEAR THE SOURCE IN
ORDER TO PROMOTE INFILTRATION AND TO DELAY THE RELEASE OF RUNOFF TO
STREAM CHANNELS; AND
(2) MINIMIZE DISTURBANCE TO EXISTING STREAMS, FLOODPLAINS,
AND RIPARIAN AND UPLAND FORESTS.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER TITLE 18 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE THE USE OF A STREAM RESTORATION PROJECT
THAT INVOLVES IN–STREAM CONSTRUCTION USING HEAVY EQUIPMENT TO
MECHANICALLY ALTER THE DIMENSIONS, PATTERN, OR PROFILE OF A STREAM,
INCLUDING ACTIVITIES THAT RELOCATE CHANNEL ALIGNMENT, REGRADE STREAM
BANKS, OR CHANGE STREAMBED ELEVATION THROUGH EXCAVATION OR FILLING,
FOR COMPLIANCE WITH:
(I) A MUNICIPAL SEPARATE STORM SEWER SYSTEM PERMIT;
(II) A TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOAD REQUIREMENT; OR
(III) A COMPENSATORY MITIGATION REQUIREMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1465
(2) COMPLETION OF THE CONSTRUCTION OF A STREAM
RESTORATION PROJECT MAY NOT BY ITSELF BE USED AS THE BASIS FOR AWARDING
ANY POLLUTION REDUCTION OR MITIGATION CREDIT.
[(d)] (F) The Department may not delay the implementation of any new
requirements or standards established under regulations adopted under this section.
[(e)] (G) The Department shall provide technical assistance, training, research,
and coordination in stormwater management technology to the local governments
consistent with the purposes of this subtitle.
4–204.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “INFEASIBLE” MEANS TECHNICALLY IMPRACTICABLE DUE
TO PHYSICAL, ENGINEERING, OR SITE–SPECIFIC CONSTRAINTS.
(II) “INFEASIBLE” DOES NOT INCLUDE CONSIDERATION OF
COSTS, PROPERTY OWNERSHIP, OR ADMINISTRATIVE CONVENIENCE.
(3) (I) “NON–STREAM–DISTURBING STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
PRACTICE” MEANS AN UPLAND OR OUT–OF–STREAM PRACTICE THAT CAPTURES AND
MANAGES STORMWATER RUNOFF AT OR NEAR THE SOURCE.
(II) “NON–STREAM–DISTURBING STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
PRACTICE” INCLUDES THE USE OF BIORETENTION, PERMEABLE PAVEMENT, TREE
PLANTINGS, BIOSWALES, GREEN ROOFS, OR STORMWATER INFRASTRUCTURE
REPAIR.
(B) (1) After July 1, 1984, unless exempted, a person may not develop any land
for residential, commercial, industrial, or institutional use without [submitting]:
(I) SUBMITTING a stormwater management plan to the county or
municipality that has jurisdiction[,]; and [obtaining]
(II) OBTAINING approval of the plan from the county or
municipality.
(2) A grading or building permit may not be issued for a property unless a
stormwater management plan has been approved that is consistent with this subtitle.
[(b)] (C) The developer shall certify that all land clearing, construction,
development, and drainage will be done according to the plan.

HOUSE BILL 1465 7
(D) A STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION
THAT INCLUDES A PROJECT INVOLVING IN–STREAM CONSTRUCTION OR THE
MECHANICAL ALTERATION OF THE DIMENSIONS, PATTERN, OR PROFILE OF A
STREAM SHALL INCLUDE AN ALTERNATIVES ANALYSIS THAT:
(1) ESTABLISHES THE SPECIFIC OBJECTIVES OF THE PROPOSED
PROJECT;
(2) IDENTIFIES A REASONABLE RANGE OF
NON–STREAM–DISTURBING STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PRACTICES CAPABLE OF
ACHIEVING THE PROJECT OBJECTIVES; AND
(3) EVALUATES THE BENEFITS AND ADVERSE IMPACT OF EACH
IDENTIFIED ALTERNATIVE STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PRACTICE.
[(c)] (E) Each county or municipality may provide by ordinance for the review
and approval of stormwater management plans by the local soil conservation district.
(F) A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICT MAY NOT
APPROVE A STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PLAN THAT RELIES PRIMARILY ON A
PROJECT INVOLVING IN–STREAM CONSTRUCTION OR THE MECHANICAL
ALTERATION OF THE DIMENSIONS, PATTERN, OR PROFILE OF A STREAM UNLESS THE
PLAN DEMONSTRATES THAT:
(1) NON–STREAM–DISTURBING STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
PRACTICES WERE EVALUATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION AND FOUND TO BE INFEASIBLE; AND
(2) THE PROPOSED PROJECT IS NECESSARY TO ADDRESS
DOCUMENTED PUBLIC SAFETY OR INFRASTRUCTURE CHALLENGES THAT CANNOT
REASONABLY BE ADDRESSED THROUGH NON–STREAM–DISTURBING PRACTICES.
[(d)] (G) (1) Each governing body of a county or municipality may adopt a
system of charges to fund the implementation of stormwater management programs,
including the following:
(i) Reviewing stormwater management plans;
(ii) Inspection and enforcement activities;
(iii) Watershed planning;
(iv) Planning, design, land acquisition, and construction of
stormwater management systems and structures;

HOUSE BILL 1465
(v) Retrofitting developed areas for pollution control;
(vi) Water quality monitoring and water quality programs;
(vii) Operation and maintenance of facilities; and
(viii) Program development of these activities.
(2) The charges shall take effect upon enactment by the local governing
body.
(3) The charges may be collected in the same manner as county and
municipal property taxes, have the same priority, and bear the same interest and penalties.
(4) The charges shall be assessed in a manner consistent with §
4–202.1(e)(3) and (f) of this subtitle.
[(e)] (H) (1) This subsection applies to a system of charges established by
Montgomery County under subsection [(d)] (G) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the county may
not impose the charge established under this section on a veterans’ organization that is
exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(4) or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code, a regularly
organized volunteer fire department that is used for public purposes, or on roads, not
including parking areas, that are owned by a homeowners association that is exempt from
taxation under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code if the roads qualify for a State or
county roadway maintenance reimbursement fund.
(3) Property owned by the State or a unit of State government in the county
may be charged under the system of charges adopted by the county under this section if:
(i) The State or a unit of State government and the county agree to
the collection of the charge from the State or a unit of State government that is based on
the share of stormwater management services related to property of the State or a unit of
State government located within the county;
(ii) The county agrees to appropriate into its own local watershed
protection and restoration fund, on an annual basis, an amount of money that is based on
the share of stormwater management services related to county property on an annual
basis; and
(iii) The county demonstrates to the satisfaction of the State or a unit
of State government that the charge collected under item (i) of this paragraph and the
money appropriated under item (ii) of this paragraph were deposited into the county’s local
watershed protection and restoration fund.

HOUSE BILL 1465 9
(4) (i) The county may establish a program to exempt from the system
of charges adopted under this section a property whose owner is able to demonstrate
substantial financial hardship.
(ii) The county may establish a separate hardship exemption
program or include a hardship exemption as part of a system of offsets to account for
on–site and off–site systems, facilities, services, or activities that reduce the quantity or
improve the quality of storm water discharged from the property.
(5) The county may impose the charge established under this section on
property owned by a veterans’ organization that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(4)
or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code or a regularly organized volunteer fire department if:
(i) The county determines that the creation of a nondiscriminatory
program for applying the charge to federal properties under the federal facilities pollution
control section of the Clean Water Act is necessary in order for the county to receive federal
funding for stormwater remediation; and
(ii) A veterans’ organization that is exempt from taxation under §
501(c)(4) or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code and a regularly organized volunteer fire
department that is used for public purposes are provided with the opportunity to apply for
an alternate compliance plan established under § 4–202.1(k)(3) of this subtitle instead of
paying a charge imposed by the county under item (i) of this paragraph.
18–102.
(a) The Department may authorize a stream and floodplain restoration project in
accordance with this section.
(b) Prior to the authorization of any stream and floodplain restoration project in
the State, the Department shall:
(1) Assess documentation submitted by the project applicant for
degradation criteria related to:
(i) An existing biological function–based parameter; and
(ii) A physical parameter, including an existing geomorphologic or
hydraulic function–based parameter;
(2) Assess whether the project applicant incorporated the following
cobenefits, as appropriate, into the application:
(i) The creation or restoration of wildlife habitat, riparian buffers,
and wetland restoration;

HOUSE BILL 1465
(ii) The restoration of aquatic resources, such as freshwater mussels,
fish passage, or oyster reefs;
(iii) Carbon sequestration;
(iv) Climate change mitigation, adaptation, or resilience;
(v) Improving and protecting public health; and
(vi) Recreational opportunities and public access to waterways and
natural habitats;
(3) Assess documentation of community notifications AND
PRESENTATIONS conducted by the project applicant prior to the submission of the
application FOR COMPLETION AND CONSISTENCY WITH THE TECHNICAL MATERIALS
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(4) Assess whether the applicant incorporated, to the extent practicable,
recognized best management practices to:
(i) Maximize ecological uplift;
(ii) Minimize:
1. Impacts to wildlife habitats;
2. Tree loss and removal;
3. Earth disturbance; and
4. Disturbance to native vegetation;
(iii) Avoid impacts to:
1. Large noninvasive native plant communities; and
2. Specimen trees;
(iv) Use existing areas suitable for material staging areas to avoid
forest removal;
(v) Limit construction access road widths;
(vi) Limit the impacts of ingress and egress points to minimize forest
impacts; and

HOUSE BILL 1465 11
(vii) Where appropriate, prioritize the removal of nonnative and
invasive:
1. Trees; and
2. Vegetation; [and]
(5) Establish a plan to provide for at least 5 years of monitoring in
accordance with subsection (d) of this section;
(6) ASSESS WHETHER THE PROPOSED PROJECT IS NECESSARY TO
ADDRESS DOCUMENTED STREAM DEGRADATION THAT CANNOT REASONABLY BE
ADDRESSED THROUGH NON–STREAM–DISTURBING STORMWATER OR WATERSHED
MANAGEMENT PRACTICES; AND
(7) PRIORITIZE THE PRESERVATION AND NONDESTRUCTIVE
MANAGEMENT OF STREAMS AND FLOODPLAINS THAT RETAIN INTACT ECOLOGICAL
FUNCTION, INCLUDING MATURE RIPARIAN AND UPLAND FORESTS.
(c) The Department’s assessment review required under subsection (b)(3) of this
section shall include:
(1) Whether the project applicant provided notice as required in § 18–101
of this title;
(2) Whether the project applicant conducted a public meeting as required
in § 18–101(d) of this title;
(3) Whether the project applicant placed appropriate project signage;
(4) Whether the project applicant considered the project’s compatibility
with local land use, especially in urban, suburban, and other high–visibility areas;
(5) Whether and how the project applicant considered and responded to
relevant public input, including any resulting modifications to the project; [and]
(6) How the project applicant considered public input in the final
application design;
(7) WHETHER PROJECT COMMUNITY NOTIFICATIONS AND
PRESENTATIONS WERE COMPLETE AND CONSISTENT WITH THE TECHNICAL
MATERIALS SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(8) ANY OTHER FACTORS THE DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS RELEVANT.

HOUSE BILL 1465
(d) (1) On completion of a stream and floodplain restoration project, the
Department shall provide for at least 5 years of monitoring per the design and permit
associated with the design for each authorized project.
(2) The monitoring required under this subsection shall include an
assessment of stream stability, stream and floodplain function, and vegetation viability
within the affected project area.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “INFEASIBLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 4–204 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE AUTHORIZATION OF A STREAM OR FLOODPLAIN
RESTORATION PROJECT UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT, BY ITSELF, QUALIFY THE
PROJECT FOR USE AS:
(I) COMPENSATORY MITIGATION FOR CONSTRUCTION
IMPACTS ON WETLANDS, STREAMS, FORESTS, OR OTHER NATURAL RESOURCES; OR
(II) COMPLIANCE WITH A MUNICIPAL SEPARATE STORMWATER
PERMIT OR TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOAD REQUIREMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE A STREAM OR FLOODPLAIN
RESTORATION PROJECT FOR A USE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION ONLY IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT:
(I) NON–STREAM–DISTURBING ALTERNATIVES WERE
EVALUATED AND FOUND TO BE INFEASIBLE; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PROJECT PRODUCES MEASURABLE FUNCTIONAL LIFT AS DEMONSTRATED
THROUGH POSTCONSTRUCTION MONITORING.
(4) (I) FOR PURPOSES OF PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
MEASURABLE FUNCTIONAL LIFT:
1. SHALL BE DEMONSTRATED THROUGH
IMPROVEMENTS TO BIOLOGICAL HABITAT OR ECOLOGICAL FUNCTION; AND
2. MAY NOT BE BASED SOLELY ON MODELED POLLUTION
LOAD REDUCTIONS, HYDRAULIC PERFORMANCE, OR PHYSICAL CHANNEL
STABILITY.
(II) WHERE BIOLOGICAL CONDITION IS A RELEVANT STREAM
ASSESSMENT CONSIDERATION, A DEMONSTRATION OF MEASURABLE FUNCTIONAL

HOUSE BILL 1465 13
LIFT SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTED IMPROVEMENTS TO BIOLOGICAL COMMUNITY
CONDITIONS AS ASSESSED USING SCIENTIFICALLY ACCEPTED BIOLOGICAL INDICES
OR EQUIVALENT INDICATORS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.